tr: Kenar ayarlayıcı tipi: Taban eğim kılavuzu; Taban kenarı eğimleyici; Kombine yan/taban ayarlayıcı; Elmas bileme taşı; Elektrikli kenar ayarlayıcı; Eğe kılavuzu; Çok amaçlı kenar ayarlayıcı; Cep tipi kenar ayarlayıcı; Yan kenar ayarlayıcı; Yan duvar kesici; Diğer
da: Type kantjustering: Vinkelstyr til base; Kantsliber til base; Kombineret side-/base-kantsliber; Diamantslibesten; Elektrisk kantsliber; Filstyr; Multiværktøj til kantslibning; Lommekantsliber; Kantsliber til side; Sidevægsskærer; Anden
hr-HR: Vrsta rubnog tunera: Vodilica za osnovni kut; Alat za kut osnovnog ruba; Kombinirani bočni/osnovni ugađač; Oštrač s dijamantnim kamenom; Električni ugađač rubova; Vodilica turpije; Višenamjenski ugađač rubova; Džepni ugađač rubova; Bočni ugađač rubova; Rezač bočnih stijenki; Ostalo
pl: Typ ostrzałki krawędzi: Prowadnica do podnoszenia krawędzi (od strony ślizgu); Ostrzałka krawędzi dolnej; Ostrzałka uniwersalna (boczna i dolna); Ostrzałka diamentowa; Ostrzałka elektryczna; Prowadnik do pilnika; Ostrzałka wielofunkcyjna; Ostrzałka kieszonkowa; Ostrzałka krawędzi bocznej; Pazur do ściągania ABS (sidewall cutter); Inna
cs: Typ brousku na hrany: Úhelník pro spodní hranu; Brousek spodní hrany; Kombinovaný brousek boční / spodní hrany; Diamantový brousek; Elektrický brousek hran; Vodicí úhelník pilníku; Multifunkční brousek hran; Kapesní brousek hran; Brousek boční hrany; Seřezávač bočnic; Ostatní
hu: Élező típusa: Talpél-szögvezető; Talpél-reszelő; Kombinált oldal-/talpél-élező; Gyémántköves élező; Elektromos élélező; Reszelővezető; Multiszerszámos élélező; Zseb élélező; Oldalél-élező; Oldalfalvágó; Egyéb
zh-TW: 刃邊調整器類型: 板底倒角導向器; 板底倒角器; 側邊/板底兩用修邊器; 鑽石磨刀石; 電動修邊器; 銼刀導向器; 多功能修邊器; 口袋型修邊器; 側邊修邊器; 側壁切割器; 其他
ru: Тип станка для заточки кромки: Направляющая для заточки со стороны скользяка; Канторез со стороны скользяка; Комбинированный канторез (боковой/со стороны скользяка); Алмазный точильный камень; Электрический канторез; Направляющая для напильника; Канторез-мультитул; Карманный канторез; Боковой канторез; Съемник оберканта (резак); Другое
pt-BR: Tipo de aparelho para afiar bordas: Guia de chanfro de base; Chanfrador de borda de base; Afiador combinado lateral/base; Afiador de pedra diamantada; Afiador de borda elétrico; Guia de lima; Afiador de borda multiferramenta; Afiador de borda de bolso; Afiador de borda lateral; Cortador de parede lateral; Outro
it: Tipo di sintonizzatore Edge: Guida per l'angolo della base; Affilatore per bordi della base; Affilalamine combinato lato/base; Affilatore in pietra diamantata; Affilalamine elettrico; Guida per lima; Affilalamine multiutensile; Affilalamine tascabile; Affilalamine laterale; Pialla per fianchi; Altro
de: Typ des Kantenschärfers: Feilenwinkel für die belagseitige Kante; Belagkantenschleifer; Kombi-Kantenschleifer (Seiten-/Belagkante); Diamantfeile; Elektrischer Kantenschleifer; Feilenwinkel; Multitool-Kantenschleifer; Taschen-Kantenschleifer; Seitenkantenschleifer; Seitenwangenschneider; Sonstige
lt-LT: Kantų galąstuvo tipas: Pagrindo briaunos kreiptuvas; Pagrindo briaunos kampo šlifuoklis; Kombinuotas šonų / pagrindo galąstuvas; Deimantinis galąstuvas; Elektrinis briaunos galąstuvas; Dildės kreiptuvas; Daugiafunkcis briaunos galąstuvas; Kišeninis briaunos galąstuvas; Šoninės briaunos galąstuvas; Šoninės sienelės pjoviklis; Kita
sv: Typ av kantavstämare: Belagskantguide; Belagskantfil; Kombinerad sido-/belagskantfil; Diamantbryne; Elektrisk kantslip; Filguide; Multikantslip; Fickkantslip; Sidokantslip; Sidokantsborttagare; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ brúsky na hrany: Vodidlo na uhlovanie skĺznice; Uhlovač hrany skĺznice; Kombinovaná brúska na bočnú hranu/skĺznicu; Diamantový brúsny kameň; Elektrická brúska na hrany; Vodidlo pilníka; Viacúčelový nástroj na hrany; Vrecková brúska na hrany; Brúska na bočné hrany; Orezávač bočníc; Iné
zh-CN: 雪板修刃工具类型: 板底倒角导轨; 板底倒角器; 板刃/板底两用磨边器; 金刚石磨刀石; 电动修边器; 锉刀导轨; 多功能修边器; 便携式修边器; 侧边修边器; 侧壁切割器; 其他
ja: エッジチューナータイプ: ベースビベルガイド; ベースエッジビベラー; サイド/ベース兼用チューナー; ダイヤモンドストーンシャープナー; 電動エッジチューナー; ファイルガイド; マルチツールエッジチューナー; ポケットエッジチューナー; サイドエッジチューナー; サイドウォールカッター; その他
el: Τύπος edge tuner: Οδηγός λοξότμησης βάσης; Εργαλείο λοξότμησης ακμής βάσης; Συνδυαστικό εργαλείο ακμών/βάσης; Ακονιστήρι με πέτρα διαμαντιού; Ηλεκτρικό εργαλείο συντήρησης ακμών; Οδηγός λίμας; Πολυεργαλείο συντήρησης ακμών; Εργαλείο συντήρησης ακμών τσέπης; Εργαλείο συντήρησης πλευρικών ακμών; Εργαλείο κοπής πλευρικού τοιχώματος; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip de tuner de margine: Ghidaj unghi bază; Sculă unghi margine bază; Dispozitiv ascuțire combinat lateral/bază; Piatră de ascuțit diamantată; Dispozitiv de ascuțit electric; Ghidaj de pilă; Dispozitiv ascuțire multifuncțional; Dispozitiv ascuțire de buzunar; Dispozitiv ascuțire margine laterală; Tăietor margine laterală; Altele
vi: Loại dụng cụ mài cạnh: Dụng cụ căn góc cạnh đáy; Dụng cụ vát cạnh đáy; Dụng cụ mài kết hợp mặt bên/đáy; Đá mài kim cương; Dụng cụ mài cạnh bằng điện; Dụng cụ định tuyến giũa; Dụng cụ mài cạnh đa năng; Dụng cụ mài cạnh bỏ túi; Dụng cụ mài cạnh bên; Dụng cụ cắt thành bên; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta robnega uglaševalnika: Vodilo za brušenje spodnjega roba; Orodje za brušenje spodnjega roba; Kombinirano orodje za stranski/spodnji rob; Ostrilnik z diamantnim kamnom; Električni ostrilnik robov; Vodilo za pilo; Večnamensko orodje za ostrenje robov; Žepni ostrilnik robov; Ostrilnik stranskega roba; Rezalnik stranske stene; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de sintonizador Edge: Guia de bisel da base; Biselador de bordo da base; Afinador combinado lateral/base; Afiador de pedra de diamante; Afinador de bordos elétrico; Guia de limas; Afinador de bordos multiferramenta; Afinador de bordos de bolso; Afinador de bordo lateral; Cortador de parede lateral; Outro
es: Tipo de afinador de cantos: Guía de bisel de base; Biselador de borde de base; Afinador combinado de base/lateral; Afilador de piedra de diamante; Afinador eléctrico de bordes; Guía de lima; Afinador de bordes multiherramienta; Afinador de bordes de bolsillo; Afinador de bordes laterales; Cortador de paredes laterales; Otro
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์แต่งขอบ: ไกด์ปรับมุมเอียงฐาน; ตัวปรับมุมเอียงขอบฐาน; เครื่องมือจูนขอบด้านข้าง/ฐานแบบผสม; หินลับมีดเพชร; เครื่องมือจูนขอบไฟฟ้า; ไกด์ตะไบ; เครื่องมือจูนขอบอเนกประสงค์; เครื่องมือจูนขอบแบบพกพา; เครื่องมือจูนขอบด้านข้าง; เครื่องมือตัดผนังด้านข้าง; อื่นๆ
fi: Kanttiteroitintyyppi: Pohjan viisteohjain; Pohjakantin viisteohjain; Yhdistetty sivu-/pohjakanttiviila; Timanttiteroitin; Sähköinen kanttiteroitin; Viilaohjain; Monitoimikanttiteroitin; Taskukokoinen kanttiteroitin; Sivukanttiteroitin; Sivuvallin leikkuri; Muu
fr: Type d’affûteur de carres: Guide de biseau de base; Biseauteur de carre de base; Affûteur combiné base/carre latérale; Affûteur en pierre de diamant; Affûteur de carres électrique; Guide de lime; Affûteur de carres multifonction; Affûteur de carres de poche; Affûteur de carre latérale; Coupe-chant; Autre
nb: Kanttunertype: Sålevinkelguide; Sålekantsliper; Kombinert side-/sålesliper; Diamantbryne; Elektrisk kantsliper; Filguide; Flerverktøyskantsliper; Lommekantsliper; Sidekantsliper; Sideveggskjærer; Annet
ko: 엣지 튜너 유형: 베이스 베벨 가이드; 베이스 엣지 베벨러; 측면/베이스 겸용 튜너; 다이아몬드 스톤 샤프너; 전동식 엣지 튜너; 파일 가이드; 멀티툴 엣지 튜너; 포켓 엣지 튜너; 측면 엣지 튜너; 사이드월 커터; 기타
en: Edge tuner type: Base bevel guide; Base edge beveler; Combination side/base tuner; Diamond stone sharpener; Electric edge tuner; File guide; Multi-tool edge tuner; Pocket edge tuner; Side edge tuner; Sidewall cutter; Other
bg-BG: Тип на механизма за настройване на ръба: Водач за ъгъла на базата; Инструмент за канта на базата; Комбиниран инструмент за страничен и базов кант; Диамантена пила за заточване; Електрически инструмент за кантове; Водач за пила; Мултифункционален инструмент за кантове; Джобен инструмент за кантове; Инструмент за страничен кант; Инструмент за изрязване на борда; Друго
nl: Kantenslijper type: Base-bevel-guide; Base-edge-beveler; Gecombineerde side-/base-tuner; Diamantsteenslijper; Elektrische randslijper; Vijlgeleider; Multitool-randslijper; Zak-randslijper; Zijrandslijper; Zijwandsnijder; Anders